District of Columbia statutes.
48-801.03

Completion and display of posters.

On and after each issue date, each pharmacy shall legibly post on the poster its current selling prices for the 100 most commonly used prescription drugs, the professional and convenience services it offers and the additional charges therefor, and the eligibility and terms of any discount it offers on prescription drugs. The completed poster shall be displayed prominently in the immediate vicinity of the prescription drug service area in such a manner as to be easily visible to consumers without having to obtain permission or assistance of an employee of the pharmacy.

History

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title I, § 103, 23 DCR 2460
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-114, § 3(a), (b), 23 DCR 8743

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-804.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-713.
1973 Ed., § 33-813.